Florida, session 2026, HB919.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb919 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 919 2026 Legislature

Section 1. Paragraph (e) is added to subsection (1) of
section 332.0075, Florida Statutes, and subsection (7) is added
to that section, to read:
332.0075 Commercial service airports; transparency and
accountability; penalty.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(e) "Major commercial service airport" means an airport
providing commercial service which is a medium or large hub
airport under the classification criteria established by the
Federal Aviation Administration.
(7)(a) The naming of major commercial service airports is
preempted to the state.
(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the major
commercial service airports are named as follows:
1. The airport located at One Jeff Fuqua Boulevard in
Orlando, or nearest thereto, is the "Orlando International
Airport."
2. The airport located at 2100 NW 42nd Avenue in Miami, or
nearest thereto, is the "Miami International Airport."
3. The airport located at 100 Terminal Drive in Fort
Lauderdale, or nearest thereto, is the "Fort Lauderdale-
Hollywood International Airport."
4. The airport located at 4100 George J. Bean Parkway in
Tampa, or nearest thereto, is the "Tampa International Airport."
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb919 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 919 2026 Legislature
5. The airport located at 11000 Terminal Access Road in
Fort Myers, or nearest thereto, is the "Southwest Florida
International Airport."
6. The airport located at 1000 James L Turnage Boulevard
in West Palm Beach, or nearest thereto, currently known as the
"Palm Beach International Airport," shall be renamed as the
"President Donald J. Trump International Airport," subject to
approval of the Federal Aviation Administration and execution of
an agreement with the rights holder authorizing the commercial
use of "President Donald J. Trump International Airport" by Palm
Beach County, which must, at a minimum, grant Palm Beach County
the perpetual and unrestricted right to use the name "President
Donald J. Trump International Airport," as well as reasonable
abbreviations thereof or deviations therefrom, at no cost, in
signage, advertising, marketing, merchandising, and promotions
and for the branding of the airport and its operations,
services, and amenities, and all related purposes.
7. The airport located at 2400 Yankee Clipper Drive in
Jacksonville, or nearest thereto, is the "Jacksonville
International Airport."
(c) If an airport listed in paragraph (b) no longer meets
the classification criteria to be a major commercial service
airport, the airport name continues to be valid.
(d) The department shall review paragraph (b) annually to
identify airports that may be added to or removed from paragraph
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb919 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 919 2026 Legislature
(b) based on any change in status as a major commercial service
airport. If the department identifies any such airport, it must
notify the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House
of Representatives 60 days before the next regular legislative
session. The notice must include the name of the airport and
specify the reasons for the airport's change in status.
(e) Government records created on or after July 1, 2026,
which refer to airports listed in paragraph (b) must use the
airport names provided in paragraph (b). For purposes of this
subsection, airport names are branding designations only and do
not create or require the creation of a new legal entity. This
paragraph does not require a political subdivision to amend any
existing agreement with any person or entity solely to update
references to the airport name or require a political
subdivision to contract in the name of the airport listed in
paragraph (b).
(f) For purposes of this subsection, the term "political
subdivision" means a political subdivision as defined in s.
333.01 that owns and controls an airport listed in paragraph
(b). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a political
subdivision does not violate any state law, including, but not
limited to, chapter 495 and s. 540.08, by using the airport name
provided in paragraph (b).
(g) A political subdivision is in compliance with this
100 subsection if it diligently pursues all necessary approvals and
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb919 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 919 2026 Legislature
101 agreements to implement an airport name change required under
102 this subsection and timely commences signage and branding
103 changes upon receipt of such approvals. For purposes of this
104 paragraph, the term "timely commences" means to initiate
105 planning, procurement, and implementation within a reasonable
106 period after receiving all necessary approvals, taking into
107 account the availability of budgeted funds and the timeframes
108 necessary to comply with applicable procurement laws,
109 regulations, and procedures.
110 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb919 -02-er